Indiana, session 2026, HB1367.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-26-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 17. Involuntary Treatment for Substance Use Disorder
Sec. 1. (a) Involuntary treatment for substance use disorder may
be considered by the court under this chapter upon the filing of a
petition with a court having jurisdiction in the county where the
individual:
(1) resides; or
(2) may be located.
(b) A petition may be filed under subsection (a) by an
individual's:
(1) spouse;
(2) legal guardian;
(3) friend or relative; or
(4) medical provider.
(c) A petition filed under subsection (a) must include the
2026 IN 1367—LS 6550/DI 149


following:
(1) The individual's name and date of birth.
(2) All factual allegations to support that the individual is:
(A) having a substance use disorder crisis;
(B) a danger to self or others or is unable to independently
maintain the individual's activities of daily living because
of a substance use disorder;
(C) unable to make the decision to seek treatment or has
refused to seek treatment for substance use disorder; and
(D) in need of treatment for substance use disorder.
(3) If the individual has been evaluated by a medical provider
within the past thirty (30) days for a substance use disorder,
the medical provider's written statement that the medical
provider believes the individual requires treatment for a
substance use disorder. If the individual has not been
evaluated by a medical provider within the past thirty (30)
days for a substance use disorder, the petition must include
this information.
(4) If an individual is represented by an attorney, the petition
must identify the individual's attorney.
(d) A petition filed under subsection (a) must be served on:
(1) the individual;
(2) any court appointed legal guardian of the individual; and
(3) the individual's attorney, if applicable.
(e) A court may waive the filing fee for a petition filed under
subsection (a) if the court determines that the petitioner is indigent.
Sec. 2. (a) Upon receipt of a petition filed under section 1 of this
chapter, unless impracticable, the court shall conduct a hearing not
later than ten (10) days after the petition is filed.
(b) If the individual is not represented by an attorney, the court
shall appoint a public defender to represent the individual.
(c) Notice of a hearing conducted under this section shall be
served on:
(1) the individual;
(2) any court appointed legal guardian of the individual;
(3) the petitioner; and
(4) the individual's attorney or the appointed public defender.
(d) A request for a continuance of the hearing described in
subsection (a) for a period of not more than thirty (30) days may
be granted for good cause shown.
(e) If a petition does not contain all information required under
section 1(c) of this chapter, the court shall dismiss the petition
2026 IN 1367—LS 6550/DI 149


without prejudice.
Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), if, upon the
completion of the hearing and consideration of the record, the
court finds that:
(1) the individual has a substance use disorder;
(2) because of the individual's substance use disorder, the
individual is experiencing impaired judgment and is:
(A) unable to independently maintain the individual's
activities of daily living; or
(B) a danger to self or others; and
(3) the individual refuses to voluntarily participate in
substance use disorder treatment;
the court shall order the individual to undergo an evaluation with
an appropriate medical provider.
(b) If the court makes findings under subsection (a), the court
shall order:
(1) the individual to undergo an evaluation with an
appropriate medical provider within fifteen (15) days; and
(2) that the evaluation from the medical provider must be
submitted to the court not later than fifteen (15) days after the
evaluation is completed. An evaluation submitted to the court
under this subdivision must include a treatment
recommendation, if applicable.
(c) If, upon the completion of the hearing and consideration of
the record, the evidence supports that the individual may meet the
criteria for emergency detention under IC 12-26-5, the court shall
order the local law enforcement agency to consider whether
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the individual has a mental
illness, is either dangerous or gravely disabled, and is in immediate
need of hospitalization and treatment under IC 12-26-5-0.5. If
applicable, the individual may be subject to the emergency
detention procedures under IC 12-26-5. If an emergency detention
is initiated, the petition for involuntary treatment filed under this
chapter shall be dismissed without prejudice.
(d) Upon receipt of an evaluation under subsection (b)(2), the
court shall do the following:
(1) Dismiss the petition if the evaluation does not recommend
that the individual requires immediate treatment for
substance use disorder.
(2) Set a hearing date to hear further evidence and make a
determination as to the appropriate treatment for the
individual if the evaluation from the medical provider
2026 IN 1367—LS 6550/DI 149


recommends immediate treatment for substance use disorder.
The individual, petitioner, and medical provider shall be
ordered to appear at the hearing. Additional witnesses with
relevant information may also appear to provide testimony.
A hearing notice issued under this section shall be served in
accordance with section 2(c) of this chapter and shall also be
served on a medical provider that has submitted an evaluation to
the court.
(e) The individual must appear at a hearing under this section.
If the individual does not appear and the court finds that:
(1) the individual was properly served; and
(2) the evidence supports that the individual knowingly and
voluntarily waived the right to be present at the hearing;
it is within the court's discretion to continue the hearing to a later
date or proceed with the hearing without the individual. A hearing
may be continued under this subsection for not more than thirty
(30) days.
(f) If the court finds, after considering the evidence presented at
a hearing ordered under subsection (d)(2), that:
(1) medical evidence supports that the individual requires
immediate treatment for a substance use disorder; and
(2) the individual has refused substance use disorder
treatment;
the court shall order the individual to receive involuntary
outpatient substance use disorder treatment for a period not to
exceed ninety (90) days. The court's treatment requirements for
the individual shall be based upon the testimony and
recommendations of a testifying medical provider that has
evaluated or treated the individual.
Sec. 4. A petition filed under this chapter shall be dismissed:
(1) when the ninety (90) day treatment period described in
section 3(f) of this chapter has expired; or
(2) when the individual voluntarily enters appropriate
substance use disorder treatment and submits documentation
confirming the voluntary treatment to the court;
whichever is earlier.
Sec. 5. Nothing in this chapter prevents an individual from being
subject to an emergency detention or commitment order under this
article, if the relevant criteria are met.
2026 IN 1367—LS 6550/DI 149